FlaskProj/en_US.aff
SET UTF-8

PFX U Y 1
PFX U 0 un .

SFX S Y 4
SFX S   y     ies        [^aeiou]y
SFX S   0     s          [aeiou]y
SFX S   0     es         [sxzh]
SFX S   0     s          [^sxzhy]

SFX B Y 5
SFX B   0     able/U       [^aeiouy]
SFX B   0     able/U       ee
SFX B   e     able/U       [^aeiou]e
SFX B   y     iable/U      [^aeiou]y
SFX B   0     able/U       [aeiou]y
