FlaskProj/en_US.dic
16
fox/S
deny/SB
good/S
work/S
fixate/S
toy/S
boss/S
rush/S
tick/S
buzz/S
spa/S
feed/S
build/SB
view/SB
forgive/SB
see/SB
